src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-miistsís_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - miistsisa - ok : # -m animate noun, tree AEW NA1
     miistsisa+NA+Sg: miistsisa
     miistsisa+NA+Pl: miistsiiksi
     miistsisa+NA+Obv: miistsisi
     miistsisa+NA+Non: miistsisi
     
     miistsisa+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nitsiistsiima, nitsiistsisa ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nitsiistsiimiiksi, nitsiistsiiksi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: [ nitsiistsiimi, nitsiistsisi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px1Sg+Non: [ nitsiistsiimi, nitsiistsisi ]
     
     miistsisa+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nitsiistsiiminnaana, nitsiistsiinnaana ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nitsiistsiiminnaaniksi, nitsiistsiinnaaniksi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: [ nitsiistsiiminnaani, nitsiistsiinnaani ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px1Pl+Non: [ nitsiistsiiminnaani, nitsiistsiinnaani ]

     miistsisa+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kitsiistsiiminnoona, kitsiistsiinnoona ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kitsiistsiiminnooniksi, kitsiistsiinnooniksi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: [ kitsiistsiiminnooni, kitsiistsiinnooni ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px21Pl+Non: [ kitsiistsiiminnooni, kitsiistsiinnooni ]

     miistsisa+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kitsiistsiima, kitsiistsisa ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kitsiistsiimiksi, kitsiistsiiksi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: [ kitsiistsiimi, kitsiistsisi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px2Sg+Non: [ kitsiistsiimi, kitsiistsisi ]

     miistsisa+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kitsiistsiimoaawa, kitsiistsisoaawa ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kitsiistsiimoaawaiksi, kitsiistsisoaawaiksi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: [ kitsiistsiimoaawayi, kitsiistsisoaawayi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px2Pl+Non: [ kitsiistsiimoaawai, kitsiistsisoaawai ]

     miistsisa+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: [ otsiistsiimiksi, otsiistsiiksi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: [ otsiistsiimi, otsiistsisi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px3Sg+Non: [ otsiistsiimi, otsiistsisi ]

     miistsisa+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: [ otsiistsiimoaawaiksi, otsiistsisoaawaiksi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: [ otsiistsiimoaawayi, otsiistsisoaawayi ]
     miistsisa+NA+Px3Pl+Non: [ otsiistsiimoaawai, otsiistsisoaawai ]

     PS/omahk+miistsisa+NA+Sg: omahksiistsisa
